Arkansas, session 2025, HB1566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 61, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-61-144. Statewide practical nursing program core curriculum.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) There are inconsistencies between practical nursing programs
in institutions of higher education across the state;
(2) These inconsistencies include varying lengths of clinical
hours, class hours, and credit hours;
(3) However, no identified correlations have been found between
the length of the practical nursing programs and pass rates of the
examinations for licensing as a practical nurse; and
(4) Adopting a statewide practical nursing program core
curriculum would result in consistency in practical nursing programs and help
improve practical nursing programs by strengthening assessment and evaluation
*JMB020*
01/30/2025 8:50:38 AM JMB020

HB1566
measures, streamlining collaborative efforts between practical nursing
programs, and providing practical nursing program structure for novice
directors, new practical nursing programs, and institutions of higher
education.
(b) On or before the 2029-2030 academic school year, all practical
nursing program in this state shall adopt the practical nursing program core
curriculum developed by the Nurse Administrators of Nursing Education
Programs as an advisory group to the Arkansas State Board of Nursing, in
accordance with the rules of the Arkansas State Board of Nursing.
(c) The practical nursing program core curriculum under subsection (b)
of this section shall:
(1) Consist of forty-four (44) credit hours;
(2) Allow each practical nursing program to:
(A) Determine the breakdown of didactic, laboratory, and
clinical hours for each course;
(B) Include additional standards to maintain additional
accreditation or institutional requirements; and
(C) Have time to meet the course learning outcomes and
standards of the rules of the board;
(3) Have two (2) options to allow certified nurse aides and
medication assistive persons to receive credit for prior learning without
being required to take redundant coursework; and
(4) Be reviewed periodically by the Nurse Administrators of
Nursing Education Programs to ensure consistency among the practical nursing
programs and to update courses for scientific and technological advancements
in nursing.
(d) The Nurse Administrators of Nursing Education Programs and the
board shall identify and address areas of concern that may arise in the
implementation of the practical nursing program core curriculum.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-87-304(a)(2), concerning the
qualifications for applicants for a practical nursing license, is amended to
read as follows:
(2)(A) Has completed a prescribed curriculum as provided under §
6-61-144 in a state-approved program for the preparation of practical nurses
and holds a diploma or certificate therefrom.
01/30/2025 8:50:38 AM JMB020

HB1566
(B) However, the board may waive this the requirement
under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section if the board determines the
applicant to be otherwise qualified.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Multi-phase adoption plan.
(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic school year, a small group
of the practical nursing programs shall pilot the practical nursing program
core curriculum developed by the Nurse Administrators of Nursing Education
Programs as an advisory group to the Arkansas State Board of Nursing, in
accordance with the rules of the Arkansas State Board of Nursing.
(b)(1) The Nurse Administrators of Nursing Education Programs and the
board shall identify and address areas of concern that may arise in the
implementation of the practical nursing program core curriculum in the first
year and make any necessary changes to the statewide practical nursing
program core curriculum.
(2) The Nurse Administrators of Nursing Education Programs and
the board shall report to the General Assembly regarding any changes to the
statewide practical nursing program core curriculum based on the first
academic school year.

















01/30/2025 8:50:38 AM JMB020